Washington statutes.
RCW 19.182.140

Provision of information to unauthorized person—Penalty.

An officer or employee of a consumer reporting agency who knowingly and willfully provides information concerning an individual from the agency's files to a person not authorized to receive that information is subject to a fine of up to five thousand dollars or imprisonment for up to three hundred sixty-four days, or both.

[ 2011 c 96 s 22; 1993 c 476 s 16.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 96: See note following RCW 9A.20.021.